Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 6. COMPACTS

CHAPTER 92. INTERSTATE WILDLIFE VIOLATOR COMPACT

Sec. 92.001. MEMBERSHIP IN INTERSTATE WILDLIFE VIOLATOR COMPACT. (a) On behalf of this state, the commission may enter into the Interstate Wildlife Violator Compact.

(b) If necessary to protect the interests of this state, the commission may withdraw from the Interstate Wildlife Violator Compact in accordance with the terms of the compact.

(c) The commission may take all actions necessary to implement this chapter, including the adoption of rules and the delegation of authority to the director.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 952 (H.B. 3391), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2009.